browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 731 Y 1
SFX 731 0 can .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 car .
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 cas .
SFX 2787 Y 1
SFX 2787 0 cat .
SFX 1547 Y 1
SFX 1547 0 idai .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 idan .
SFX 1375 Y 1
SFX 1375 0 idar .
SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73 0 idas .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 0 siuns .
SFX 4298 Y 1
SFX 4298 0 ocava .
SFX 1947 Y 1
SFX 1947 0 ariseschan .
SFX 1946 Y 1
SFX 1946 0 ariseschas .
SFX 4424 Y 1
SFX 4424 0 linai .
SFX 4421 Y 1
SFX 4421 0 linar .
SFX 2176 Y 1
SFX 2176 0 linas .
SFX 1570 Y 1
SFX 1570 0 cca .
SFX 3641 Y 1
SFX 3641 0 vesì .
SFX 3960 Y 1
SFX 3960 0 tegiain .
SFX 3959 Y 1
SFX 3959 0 tegiais .
SFX 3524 Y 1
SFX 3524 0 ced .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 ider .
SFX 3746 Y 1
SFX 3746 0 ultim .
SFX 4685 Y 1
SFX 4685 0 fist .
SFX 1151 Y 1
SFX 1151 0 itada .
SFX 4735 Y 1
SFX 4735 0 erleschia .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 itads .
SFX 3716 Y 1
SFX 3716 0 unalisesch .
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 schada .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 schads .
SFX 638 Y 1
SFX 638 0 pian .
SFX 619 Y 1
SFX 619 0 pias .
SFX 3775 Y 1
SFX 3775 0 ualisass .
SFX 1169 Y 1
SFX 1169 0 ieschia .
SFX 845 Y 1
SFX 845 0 ulassan .
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 0 cha .
SFX 844 Y 1
SFX 844 0 ulassas .
SFX 1193 Y 1
SFX 1193 0 chs .
SFX 3360 Y 1
SFX 3360 0 fitgeschian .
SFX 3722 Y 1
SFX 3722 0 unalisassan .
SFX 3359 Y 1
SFX 3359 0 fitgeschias .
SFX 3721 Y 1
SFX 3721 0 unalisassas .
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 0 lisesch .
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 isadas .
SFX 4893 Y 1
SFX 4893 0 cia .
SFX 3451 Y 1
SFX 3451 0 divisiun .
SFX 4692 Y 1
SFX 4692 0 fatsch .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 0 idia .
SFX 1945 Y 1
SFX 1945 0 ariseschia .
SFX 3119 Y 1
SFX 3119 0 pida .
SFX 3772 Y 1
SFX 3772 0 ualisava .
SFX 2976 Y 1
SFX 2976 0 trassan .
SFX 2975 Y 1
SFX 2975 0 trassas .
SFX 4907 Y 1
SFX 4907 0 calas .
SFX 1148 Y 1
SFX 1148 0 itain .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 itais .
SFX 1900 Y 1
SFX 1900 0 igliadas .
SFX 2594 Y 1
SFX 2594 0 landais .
SFX 3419 Y 1
SFX 3419 0 elina .
SFX 1424 Y 1
SFX 1424 0 ulaziun .
SFX 3717 Y 1
SFX 3717 0 unalisaziun .
SFX 404 Y 1
SFX 404 0 schain .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 schais .
SFX 1192 Y 1
SFX 1192 0 cla .
SFX 1051 Y 1
SFX 1051 0 isader .
SFX 4267 Y 1
SFX 4267 0 onist .
SFX 3957 Y 1
SFX 3957 0 tegiass .
SFX 4920 Y 1
SFX 4920 0 bilisescha .
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 0 ifitgond .
SFX 2642 Y 1
SFX 2642 0 ignavan .
SFX 2641 Y 1
SFX 2641 0 ignavas .
SFX 4870 Y 1
SFX 4870 0 cor .
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 0 ilescha .
SFX 4916 Y 1
SFX 4916 0 biliseschian .
SFX 4915 Y 1
SFX 4915 0 biliseschias .
SFX 4486 Y 1
SFX 4486 0 itant .
SFX 631 Y 1
SFX 631 0 aglia .
SFX 3954 Y 1
SFX 3954 0 tegiava .
SFX 4120 Y 1
SFX 4120 0 schant .
SFX 782 Y 1
SFX 782 0 idra .
SFX 4212 Y 1
SFX 4212 0 portassan .
SFX 4211 Y 1
SFX 4211 0 portassas .
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 0 nond .
SFX 1475 Y 1
SFX 1475 0 ometer .
SFX 4003 Y 1
SFX 4003 0 ssavan .
SFX 4002 Y 1
SFX 4002 0 ssavas .
SFX 1370 Y 1
SFX 1370 0 itara .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 ziuns .
SFX 1840 Y 1
SFX 1840 0 pina .
SFX 4485 Y 1
SFX 4485 0 itars .
SFX 2226 Y 1
SFX 2226 0 igliun .
SFX 3648 Y 1
SFX 3648 0 vavan .
SFX 3647 Y 1
SFX 3647 0 vavas .
SFX 3184 Y 1
SFX 3184 0 ndadas .
SFX 1146 Y 1
SFX 1146 0 itass .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 entà .
SFX 2775 Y 1
SFX 2775 0 cul .
SFX 1566 Y 1
SFX 1566 0 cun .
SFX 3461 Y 1
SFX 3461 0 cur .
SFX 1565 Y 1
SFX 1565 0 cus .
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 0 schass .
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 0 tisada .
SFX 1231 Y 1
SFX 1231 0 tisads .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 0 trond .
SFX 655 Y 1
SFX 655 0 rai .
SFX 2131 Y 1
SFX 2131 0 ral .
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 0 ran .
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 0 rar .
SFX 244 Y 1
SFX 244 0 ras .
SFX 4182 Y 1
SFX 4182 0 rat .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 isai .
SFX 2607 Y 1
SFX 2607 0 isan .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 isar .
SFX 1539 Y 1
SFX 1539 0 isas .
SFX 3963 Y 1
SFX 3963 0 tegiadas .
SFX 1143 Y 1
SFX 1143 0 itava .
SFX 1948 Y 1
SFX 1948 0 arisescha .
SFX 2649 Y 1
SFX 2649 0 ignai .
SFX 4559 Y 1
SFX 4559 0 ignan .
SFX 2225 Y 1
SFX 2225 0 ignar .
SFX 3298 Y 1
SFX 3298 0 ignas .
SFX 3195 Y 1
SFX 3195 0 modern .
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 0 schava .
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 0 isond .
SFX 4995 Y 1
SFX 4995 0 angulara .
SFX 4042 Y 1
SFX 4042 0 segnian .
SFX 4041 Y 1
SFX 4041 0 segnias .
SFX 1883 Y 1
SFX 1883 0 isch .
SFX 4530 Y 1
SFX 4530 0 isadra .
SFX 997 Y 1
SFX 997 0 reschan .
SFX 4308 Y 1
SFX 4308 0 ocà .
SFX 996 Y 1
SFX 996 0 reschas .
SFX 3594 Y 1
SFX 3594 0 alada .
SFX 2515 Y 1
SFX 2515 0 rda .
SFX 3787 Y 1
SFX 3787 0 tunond .
SFX 3592 Y 1
SFX 3592 0 alads .
SFX 2341 Y 1
SFX 2341 0 zial .
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 0 zian .
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 zias .
SFX 3677 Y 1
SFX 3677 0 uplassan .
SFX 3676 Y 1
SFX 3676 0 uplassas .
SFX 863 Y 1
SFX 863 0 rel .
SFX 1122 Y 1
SFX 1122 0 rer .
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 0 ret .
SFX 4614 Y 1
SFX 4614 0 iclada .
SFX 1229 Y 1
SFX 1229 0 tisain .
SFX 4612 Y 1
SFX 4612 0 iclads .
SFX 1228 Y 1
SFX 1228 0 tisais .
SFX 4758 Y 1
SFX 4758 0 ennitad .
SFX 4227 Y 1
SFX 4227 0 piva .
SFX 2838 Y 1
SFX 2838 0 aschà .
SFX 2297 Y 1
SFX 2297 0 erà .
SFX 930 Y 1
SFX 930 0 uleschian .
SFX 929 Y 1
SFX 929 0 uleschias .
SFX 1356 Y 1
SFX 1356 0 meschian .
SFX 1355 Y 1
SFX 1355 0 meschias .
SFX 4674 Y 1
SFX 4674 0 gidas .
SFX 4844 Y 1
SFX 4844 0 cziuns .
SFX 2025 Y 1
SFX 2025 0 utta .
SFX 3028 Y 1
SFX 3028 0 streschan .
SFX 3027 Y 1
SFX 3027 0 streschas .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 ria .
SFX 1121 Y 1
SFX 1121 0 ric .
SFX 2847 Y 1
SFX 2847 0 alain .
SFX 3590 Y 1
SFX 3590 0 alais .
SFX 4171 Y 1
SFX 4171 0 rim .
SFX 443 Y 1
SFX 443 0 rin .
SFX 3104 Y 1
SFX 3104 0 rir .
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 0 ris .
SFX 3179 Y 1
SFX 3179 0 ndassan .
SFX 3178 Y 1
SFX 3178 0 ndassas .
SFX 4557 Y 1
SFX 4557 0 ignia .
SFX 2660 Y 1
SFX 2660 0 'idea .
SFX 4610 Y 1
SFX 4610 0 iclain .
SFX 4609 Y 1
SFX 4609 0 iclais .
SFX 1610 Y 1
SFX 1610 0 schidas .
SFX 2190 Y 1
SFX 2190 0 itgassan .
SFX 2189 Y 1
SFX 2189 0 itgassas .
SFX 1416 Y 1
SFX 1416 0 uresch .
SFX 942 Y 1
SFX 942 0 reschia .
SFX 1272 Y 1
SFX 1272 0 ivamain .
SFX 3250 Y 1
SFX 3250 0 itgesch .
SFX 4030 Y 1
SFX 4030 0 siunada .
SFX 438 Y 1
SFX 438 0 lesch .
SFX 3258 Y 1
SFX 3258 0 isma .
SFX 1659 Y 1
SFX 1659 0 mentada .
SFX 1657 Y 1
SFX 1657 0 mentads .
SFX 2633 Y 1
SFX 2633 0 ileschan .
SFX 2632 Y 1
SFX 2632 0 ileschas .
SFX 4086 Y 1
SFX 4086 0 schentond .
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 0 tà .
SFX 3018 Y 1
SFX 3018 0 tè .
SFX 853 Y 1
SFX 853 0 tì .
SFX 1227 Y 1
SFX 1227 0 tisass .
SFX 4401 Y 1
SFX 4401 0 lusa .
SFX 4658 Y 1
SFX 4658 0 glinas .
SFX 3026 Y 1
SFX 3026 0 streschia .
SFX 340 Y 1
SFX 340 0 entond .
SFX 3073 Y 1
SFX 3073 0 segnà .
SFX 4028 Y 1
SFX 4028 0 siunain .
SFX 4027 Y 1
SFX 4027 0 siunais .
SFX 1224 Y 1
SFX 1224 0 tisava .
SFX 3370 Y 1
SFX 3370 0 fitgassan .
SFX 3369 Y 1
SFX 3369 0 fitgassas .
SFX 3588 Y 1
SFX 3588 0 alass .
SFX 4950 Y 1
SFX 4950 0 bassan .
SFX 1655 Y 1
SFX 1655 0 mentain .
SFX 1875 Y 1
SFX 1875 0 issa .
SFX 4949 Y 1
SFX 4949 0 bassas .
SFX 1654 Y 1
SFX 1654 0 mentais .
SFX 3452 Y 1
SFX 3452 0 ditas .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 travan .
SFX 2655 Y 1
SFX 2655 0 ietta .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 0 travas .
SFX 2512 Y 1
SFX 2512 0 rta .
SFX 3088 Y 1
SFX 3088 0 rts .
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 0 ista .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 isti .
SFX 484 Y 1
SFX 484 0 ists .
SFX 3275 Y 1
SFX 3275 0 imassan .
SFX 4306 Y 1
SFX 4306 0 ocadas .
SFX 4607 Y 1
SFX 4607 0 iclass .
SFX 3274 Y 1
SFX 3274 0 imassas .
SFX 4012 Y 1
SFX 4012 0 ssai .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 ssan .
SFX 4008 Y 1
SFX 4008 0 ssar .
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 0 ssas .
SFX 1118 Y 1
SFX 1118 0 run .
SFX 2752 Y 1
SFX 2752 0 drassan .
SFX 4145 Y 1
SFX 4145 0 rus .
SFX 3086 Y 1
SFX 3086 0 rut .
SFX 2751 Y 1
SFX 2751 0 drassas .
SFX 4806 Y 1
SFX 4806 0 ectavan .
SFX 4805 Y 1
SFX 4805 0 ectavas .
SFX 4540 Y 1
SFX 4540 0 'impurtanza .
SFX 2375 Y 1
SFX 2375 0 uman .
SFX 3585 Y 1
SFX 3585 0 alava .
SFX 2631 Y 1
SFX 2631 0 ileschia .
SFX 4604 Y 1
SFX 4604 0 iclava .
SFX 3169 Y 1
SFX 3169 0 ndond .
SFX 2625 Y 1
SFX 2625 0 imaziun .
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 ziun .
SFX 4686 Y 1
SFX 4686 0 fidà .
SFX 1696 Y 1
SFX 1696 0 'ins .
SFX 1606 Y 1
SFX 1606 0 ssem .
SFX 3748 Y 1
SFX 3748 0 ulenta .
SFX 4386 Y 1
SFX 4386 0 minescha .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 0 gnond .
SFX 3820 Y 1
SFX 3820 0 ttadas .
