browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
bandi/404,433,434,675,777,820,859,860,861,891,892,893,894,895,896,1461,2399,4742
cassa/1,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,53,66,89,90,91,92,93,111,112,186,625,966,1541,1570,2162,4700,4702,4704
edi/1,2,11,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,61,66,138,140,142,150,157,158,160,161,163,166,167,168,169,170,171,185,249,266,316,317,318,319,320,332,333,607,987,1213,3358,3359,3360,3361,3362,3363,3364,3365,3366,3367,3368,3369,3370,3371,3372,3373,3374,3375,3376,3377,3378,3379,3382,3464
engrav/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,1375,1545,1546,1547,1705,1707,1708,1709,1710,1711,1712,1713,1714,1715,1716,3306,3307,3308,3309,3310,3311,3312
ent/5,64,80,151,376,381,570,739,773,805,840,841,842,843,844,845,846,847,848,849,850,851,929,930,931,932,933,934,935,961,1771,2206,2328,2372,2471,2472,4725,4726,4727
facil/65,361,707,1140,1141,1142,1144,1145,1147,1148,1152,1369
Fas/4893
fieu/1,150,225,1336,1812,2966,2972,2973,2975,2976,2979,2980,2981,2983,2984
gran/57,98,162,177,243,369,739,773,805,840,841,842,843,844,845,846,847,848,849,850,851,926,1099,1424,1528,1839,2301,2603,2923,3418,3443,3450,4009,4770
invent/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,70,141,178,196,224,473,1942,1943,1944,1945,1946,1947,1948,1949,1950,1951,1952,1953,1954,1955,1956,1957,1958,1959,1960,1961,1962,1963,2323
litgas/3119
l'util/134,1051
mal/1,3,5,81,191,192,308,361,405,642,666,667,693,694,695,696,722,723,724,725,751,752,753,754,786,787,788,830,1131,1136,1175,1480,1750,1872,2013,2293,2652,2653,2700,2768,3124,3298,3356,3550,3601,3641,4447,4686,4799,4957,4963
Mar/1,6,10,56,203,363,368,428,647,889,1312,1375,1565,1695,1760,2655,3137
pau/1,2,14,17,19,23,102,201,203,235,352,393,703,759,1044,1135,1136,1827,2437,2516,2789,3060,3084,3115,4340,4896
persunal/1,3,5,7,64,65,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,357,1275
pop/183,326,773,840,850,851,1243,3419,3688
prov/1280,3134,3135,3136,4287,4288,4289,4290,4291,4292,4296,4297,4298,4299,4300,4301,4302,4303,4304,4305,4306,4307,4308
resent/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,71,72,73,74,86,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,534
ris/35,43,246,436,631,1000,2318
rum/9,10,15,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,71,72,73,74,86,135,136,143,145,147,148,149,151,152,261,309,337,381,406,439,445,451,468,469,478,479,482,485,486,487,488,489,490,491,492,493,532,533,545,546,600,619,638,879,962,1004,1005,1006,1044,1406,1639,1848,2141,4282,4283,4284,4285,4539
sala/1862,2079,2110,2477,3213,4685
saut/986,1373,1543,1700,1701,1702,1703,1891,1892,1893,1894,1896,1897,1898,1899,1900
scus/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,23,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,86,94,97,100,103,104,135,145,147,148,149,152,201,309,890,1586,2096,2400,3904,3937
stgarp/3,4,5,6,7,8,10,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,80,780,1002,1528,2176,3240,3241,4411,4415,4416,4417,4418,4419,4420,4421,4422,4423,4424,4425,4426,4427,4428,4478
stgauda/4228,4870
sub/9,10,15,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,71,72,73,74,86,105,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,369,1069,2074,2105,2314,2458,2467,2846,2881,3009,3043,3074,3106,3124,3451,3452,3453,3864,3984,3986,3998,4035,4059,4060,4061,4062,4063,4064,4065,4066,4067,4068,4069,4070,4071,4072,4073,4074,4075,4076,4379,4822
tagliava/309
Tai/2,2594,3450
text/1,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,70,141,192,556,674,1054,2373,2386,3415,3762,3763,3764,3765,3766,3767,3768,3769,3770,3771,3772,3773,3774,3775,3776,3777,3778,3779,3780,3781,3782,3783
tschantsch/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,98,803,1310,2709,3395,3396,3397,3398,3399,3400,3401,3402,3403,3404,3405,3406,3407,3408,4733,4734,4735,4736,4737,4738,4739
tschintg/877,1309,1427,3746
tschuf/1,4692
tubac/1,454,537,538,557,567,3542
util/3,5,64,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,707,1051,1275,1679,4530,4531
vas/5,10,56,60,78,82,102,180,217,290,382,453,1193,1239,1241,1938,2315,3419,3498,3499
verti/1,2,11,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,61,1136,1404,2788,4865,4906,4907
vip/244
